tables/en-us-interline.ctb
# other prefixes
begword electro =
begword neuro =
begword psycho 1234-234-13456-16-135
endword s' 234-3
endword in' =
endword 'd 3-145 back-translation: = doesn't work
endword 'm 3-134
endword 're 3-1235-15
endword 've 3-1236-15
endword 'll 3-123-123
endword 's 3-234
endword 't 3-2345
word 'em = 
always -com 36-14-135-134
endword -to = pointed-to resource

word abalone =
sufword abecedarian 1-12-15-14-15-145-345-24-1-1345
midendword aean =
begword aen =
begword aftere 1-124-2345-12456-15 aftereffect
begword afteri 1-124-2345-12456-24 afterimage
sufword airedale =
sufword anemone = 
sufword anteat =
word antigone =
word baloney =
sufword bandog =
sufword battledo = battledor battledome
always bedragg 23-145-1235-1-2356
sufword beguine 12-15-1245-136-35-15 proper name
sufword belittle 23-123-123
always benares 23-1345-345-15-234
begword benev 23-1345-15-1236
begword bene 12-26-15
always bering 12-12456-346
always bezel =
syllable nomial =
always boer =
always burlingam =
word caen =
midendword lingian 123-346-24-1-1345
endword reagh 1235-2-126 castlereagh
sufword cation 14-1-2345-24-135-1345
always chatham 16-1-2345-125-1-134
always cicerone 14-24-14-12456-135-1345-15
always blenz 12-123-26-1356
always enzym 26-1356-134
always coname 14-135-5-1345
word conally 14-135-1345-6-13456
word conatus =
word conestoga 25-15-34-135-1245-1
word coney =
word conidium =
endword zione =
word cony =
sufword deaconess 145-2-14-135-56-234
begword denation 145-15-1345-6-1345
syllable natur =
always derogate 145-12456-135-1245-1-2345-15
always dinghy 145-35-126-13456
always  doggone 145-135-1245-1245-5-135
always donee =
word donegal =
begword equidis = equidistant
midendword thereally 2346-1235-15-6-13456 ethereally
midendword enook =
always eversion 15-1236-12456-46-1345
sufword falconet =
sufword feringhee 124-12456-35-126-15-15
begword fired = firedamp firedrake
always francene 124-1235-1-1345-14-26-15
contraction frs
sufword froward 124-1235-135-2456-345-145
sufword garderobe 1245-345-145-15-1235-135-12-15
midendword ometer 135-134-15-2345-12456 gasometer
always gastight 1245-1-234-2345-24-126-2345
word goering 1245-135-15-1235-346
word Goodwill = with a cap
word Goody = with a cap
word Goodyear 1245-135-135-145-13456-15-345
always genealog 1245-26-15-1-123-135-1245
syllable herd = goatherd
begword conan =
always thold = berthold
always equino =
syllable thill = anthill
word conch 14-135-1345-16
word conches 14-135-1345-16-15-234
syllable urinary 136-1235-35-345-13456
always goddam =
always oering  135-15-1235-346
always handsomer 125-12346-5-234-1235
always heartsease 125-15-345-2345-234-15-1-234-15
always hereford 125-12456-15-123456-145
always hereupon 5-125-45-136
endword sheimer 234-125-15-24-134-12456
always hermione 125-12456-134-24-135-1345-15
always hoity =
always toity =
midendword blence 12-123-56-15
midendword blend 12-123-26-145
syllable rubber 1235-136-23-12456 indiarubber
begword indist 35-145-24-234-2345 indistinct
begword inerad 35-15-1235-1-145 ineradicable
begword ingl 35-1245-123 inglewood inglenook
word iredell =
begword irre =
word jaconet =
word jehad =
word jihad = 
word konev =
contraction lrs
word limeade =
always lineag 123-35-2-1245
contraction llr
always littleton = proper noun
always littlejohn = surname
always letterman = surname
always oweed 135-2456-15-1246 locoweed
always lonesome 123-5-135-5-234
always maenad =
always menhaden 134-26-125-1-145-26
midendword encephal 26-14-15-1234-125-1-123
sufword misoneism =
sufword misterm 134-24-234-2345-12456-134
sufword mistitl =
always misword 134-24-234-45-2456
word more'n =
word nonesuch 1345-5-135-234-16
word noway = change entry of noways
word nowise =
sufword nuthatch 1345-136-2345-125-1-2345-16
begword oed = oedipus
always oneida =
word orangeade =
begword out 1256-2345 outhaul
endword full = overfull 
begword oleag = oleaginous
always peritoneum 1234-12456-24-2345-135-1345-15-136-134
always peroneal 1234-12456-135-1345-2-123
always persephone 1234-12456-234-15-1234-125-135-1345-15
begword pinedr 1234-35-15-145-1235 pinedrop
syllable root = pokeroot snakeroot
always poleax = poleax
sufword potherb 1234-123-2345-125-12456-12
sufword potsherd 1234-135-2345-146-12456-145
syllable hunter 125-136-1345-2345-12456 pothunter
always praenom =
always predecess 1234-1235-15-14-15-234-234
always predicat 1234-1235-1246-24-14-1-2345
always prounion =
endword  edelic = psychedelic
begword reaffor 1235-15-1-125-123456 reafforestation
begword reappor = reapportion
begword reavow  1235-15-1-1236-246
begword redac = redact
begword rededic 1235-15-145-1246-24-14 rededicate
always redingote 1235-1246-346-135-2345-15
begword renav = renavigated
always renegad 1235-26-15-1245-1-145
always rerefin 1235-15-1235-15-124-35
begword resth = restharrow
endword flery = riflery
begword roped = ropedance
always roustabout 1235-1256-34-1-12
word sadowa =
always scattergood 234-14-1-2345-2345-12456-1245-145
word sever 234-5-15
word severs 234-5-15-234
word severed 234-5-15-1246
word severing 234-5-15-346
always severn 234-5-15-1345
midword sever 234-15-1236-12456 perseverance 
word several 234-5-15-1-123 severally
always shofar 146-12356-345
always shoshone 146-135-146-135-1345-15
begword skeda = skedaddle
always smitheren 234-134-24-2346-1235-26 proper name
endword ouno = radiouno
always sparerib 234-1234-345-15-1235-14-12
always speakeas 234-1234-2-13-15-1-234
begword spiken = spikenard
syllable hound 125-46-145 loghound 
always stingar 34-346-345
always owork 135-5-2456 cowork stuccowork
begword cowr = cowrote
endword enaed 15-1345-1-1246 subpoenaed 
begword threenod 1456-1235-15-15-1345-135-145 threenode
always tranship 2345-1235-1-1345-146-24-1234
begword trinar 2345-1235-24-1345-234 trinary trinaries
always turnabout 2345-136-1235-1345-1-12
always dledee =
always dledum = tweedledee and tweedledum
always twould 2345-2456-145
begword unblea 136-1345-12-123-2 unbleach?
begword unbless 136-1345-12-46-234
begword underog =
begword underiv =
always vicenar 1236-24-14-26-345
sufword violone =
sufword wakerif =
always wenceslaus 2456-26-14-15-234-123-1-136-234
word whereabouts 5-156-1-12-234
begword wired = wiredance
always wiseacr =
always you'n 13456-1256-3-1345
always zingaro  1356-346-345-135
always zwinglian 1356-2456-346-123-24-1-1345
sufword thorn 1456-135-1235-1345
word hearths 125-15-345-1456-234
word hearth 125-15-345-1456

# Problems handled with context
context _$l["."]$l @256 U.S.
context _$d["a"] @56-1

always --- 36-36-36
